Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2113
Complaints.

Written complaints regarding the registration of a contractor made to the commissioner in which the complainant provides his or her name and address shall receive a written response as to the results of the investigation. A complainant's name and other identifying information shall not be released if the complaint was included as a part of another complaint when the complainant's identity would be protected under other statutes or rules and regulations.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 11.